Colorado, session 2026A, HB1112.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Underground injection control wells, referred to in this section
as "UIC wells", are used to place fluid underground into geologic
formations;
(b) The United States environmental protection agency, referred
to in this section as the "EPA", regulates the construction and operation
of 6 classes of UIC wells, which are classified based on the type of fluid
injected and the depth of the injection in relation to underground sources
of drinking water;
(c) The federal "Safe Drinking Water Act" requires the EPA to
develop UIC well program requirements that protect underground sources
of drinking water from endangerment;
(d) The EPA may grant primacy enforcement and regulatory
authority, referred to in this section as "primacy", to a state;
(e) Colorado, specifically the Colorado energy and carbon
-2- 1112

management commission, has primacy over class II UIC wells and
anticipates gaining primacy over class VI UIC wells in 2026; all other
classes of UIC wells are still regulated by the EPA; and
(f) As of July 2025, over half of the states in the United States
have been granted primacy by the EPA for at least class I, II, III, IV, and
V UIC wells, and 5 states have been granted full primacy for all UIC well
classes.
(2) The general assembly therefore declares that:
(a) It is in the public interest for Colorado state agencies to
regulate all UIC well classes;
(b) Primacy over all UIC well classes will enable Colorado to
have a tailored approach to UIC well regulation that:

(I) Attracts and supports emerging industries with technologies to
help achieve climate goals, including carbon management, geothermal,
and hydrogen operations;
(II) Facilitates innovative water management strategies, including
aquifer recharge, storage, and recovery necessary to meet the state's water
challenges;
(III) Provides a more straightforward approach to permitting,
authorizing, and regulating several industries where state and federal
authorities currently overlap;
(IV) Provides reliability in resource commitment and expectations
amidst fluctuating federal priorities; and
(V) Establishes timely and efficient authorization and permitting
processes;
(c) Colorado will regulate UIC wells in a manner that protects
-3- 1112

public health, safety, and welfare; the environment; wildlife resources;
and underground sources of drinking water; and
(d) The Colorado energy and carbon management commission
should lead the state's primacy application process and collaborate with
the division of reclamation, mining, and safety and the division of water
resources in the Colorado department of natural resources, the Colorado
department of public health and environment, and the Colorado
department of labor and employment.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-60-102, add (4)
as follows:
34-60-102. Legislative declaration.
(4) IT IS FURTHER DECLARED TO BE IN THE PUBLIC INTEREST FOR
THE COMMISSION TO SEEK AND RECEIVE PRIMACY OVER CLASS I, CLASS IV,
AND CLASS V INJECTION WELLS CLASSIFIED IN 40 CFR 144.6 BECAUSE
PRIMACY WILL ENABLE COLORADO TO HAVE A TAILORED APPROACH TO
INJECTION WELL REGULATION THAT:
(a) FACILITATES INNOVATIVE WATER MANAGEMENT STRATEGIES,
INCLUDING AQUIFER RECHARGE, STORAGE, AND RECOVERY NECESSARY TO
MEET THE STATE'S WATER CHALLENGES;
(b) PROVIDES A MORE STRAIGHTFORWARD APPROACH TO
PERMITTING, AUTHORIZING, AND REGULATING SEVERAL INDUSTRIES
WHERE STATE AND FEDERAL AUTHORITIES CURRENTLY OVERLAP;
(c) PROVIDES RELIABILITY IN RESOURCE COMMITMENT AND
EXPECTATIONS AMIDST FLUCTUATING FEDERAL PRIORITIES; AND
(d) ESTABLISHES TIMELY AND EFFICIENT AUTHORIZATION AND
PERMITTING PROCESSES.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-60-106, add (23)
-4- 1112

and (24) as follows:
34-60-106. Additional powers of commission - fees - rules -
definitions - repeal.
(23) (a) (I) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 34-60-120 OR ANY OTHER
PROVISION OF LAW OTHER THAN SECTION 34-60-105 (4), AS TO CLASS I,
CLASS IV, AND CLASS V INJECTION WELLS CLASSIFIED IN 40 CFR 144.6,
THE COMMISSION MAY PERFORM ALL ACTS FOR THE PURPOSE OF
PROTECTING UNDERGROUND SOURCES OF DRINKING WATER IN
ACCORDANCE WITH STATE PROGRAMS AUTHORIZED BY THE FEDERAL
"SAFE DRINKING WATER ACT", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 300f ET SEQ., AND
REGULATIONS UNDER THOSE SECTIONS, AS AMENDED.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY SEEK CLASS I, CLASS IV, AND CLASS
V INJECTION WELL PRIMACY UNDER THE FEDERAL "SAFE DRINKING
WATER ACT", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 300f ET SEQ., AND REGULATIONS UNDER
THOSE SECTIONS, AS AMENDED. THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT RULES FOR
THE PURPOSES OF ESTABLISHING AND OPERATING THE UNDERGROUND
INJECTION CONTROL AUTHORIZATION AND PERMIT PROGRAM. THE RULES
ADOPTED BY THE COMMISSION MUST MEET THE REQUIREMENTS
PRESCRIBED BY 42 U.S.C. SEC. 300h (b), AS AMENDED. THE COMMISSION
SHALL SEEK TO ESTABLISH TIMELY AND EFFICIENT AUTHORIZATION AND
PERMITTING PROCESSES. UPON RECEIVING PRIMACY, THE COMMISSION
MAY ENFORCE RULES FOR THE PERMITTING, AUTHORIZATION, AND
REGULATION OF CLASS I, CLASS IV, AND CLASS V INJECTION WELLS IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (23).
(III) THE COMMISSION MAY ADOPT RULES RELATED TO CLASS I,
CLASS IV, AND CLASS V INJECTION WELLS THAT ARE MORE STRINGENT
THAN CORRESPONDING ENFORCEABLE TECHNICAL FEDERAL
-5- 1112

REQUIREMENTS ONLY IF IT IS DEMONSTRATED AT A PUBLIC HEARING, AND
THE COMMISSION FINDS, THAT RULES MORE STRINGENT THAN THE
CORRESPONDING FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS ARE NECESSARY TO PROTECT
PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE; THE ENVIRONMENT; AND
WILDLIFE RESOURCES. A FINDING PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION
(23)(a)(III) BY THE COMMISSION MUST BE ACCOMPANIED BY A STATEMENT
OF BASIS AND PURPOSE REFERRING TO AND EVALUATING INFORMATION
AND STUDIES RELATED TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE; THE
ENVIRONMENT; AND WILDLIFE RESOURCES CONTAINED IN THE RECORD
THAT FORMS THE BASIS FOR THE COMMISSION'S FINDING.
(b) A PERSON THAT WILLFULLY VIOLATES A CLASS I, CLASS IV, OR
CLASS V INJECTION WELL RULE, PERMIT, AUTHORIZATION, OR ORDER OF
THE COMMISSION ISSUED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (23) COMMITS A
MISDEMEANOR AND, UPON CONVICTION BY A COURT OF COMPETENT
JURISDICTION, IS SUBJECT TO A FINE OF AT LEAST FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS
AND NO MORE THAN SEVEN THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR EACH
ACT OF VIOLATION AND FOR EACH DAY THAT THE PERSON REMAINS IN
VIOLATION.
(c) (I) FOR THE PURPOSES OF IMPLEMENTING AND ADMINISTERING
THIS SUBSECTION (23), THE COMMISSION MAY ASSESS AND COLLECT FEES,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PERMITTING AND REGULATORY FEES FOR
CLASS I, CLASS IV, AND CLASS V INJECTION WELLS, IN AN AMOUNT AND
FREQUENCY DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION BY RULE. THE COMMISSION
SHALL SET THE FEES IN AN AMOUNT TO COVER THE COMMISSION'S DIRECT
AND INDIRECT AND REASONABLY NECESSARY COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING
AND ADMINISTERING THIS SUBSECTION (23).
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE FEES ASSESSED AND
-6- 1112

COLLECTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (23)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION TO THE
ENERGY AND CARBON MANAGEMENT CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
34-60-122 (5).
(d) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY PROVISION OF THIS SECTION TO THE
CONTRARY, NOTHING IN THIS SECTION ESTABLISHES, ALTERS, IMPAIRS, OR
NEGATES THE ABILITY OF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT TO REGULATE LAND USE
RELATED TO CLASS I, CLASS IV, OR CLASS V INJECTION WELLS.
(e) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES CREATED IN SECTION 24-33-101 (1) SHALL PROPOSE, AS PART
OF THE ANNUAL BUDGET REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-3-208, INITIAL SPENDING AUTHORITY
IN THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO ENFORCE RULES FOR THE PERMITTING,
AUTHORIZATION, AND REGULATION OF CLASS I, CLASS IV, AND CLASS V
INJECTION WELLS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (23). THE
OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING CREATED IN SECTION
24-37-102, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES, SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET REQUEST SUBMITTED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-3-208 A PROPOSAL TO ELIMINATE OR MINIMIZE
THE IMPACT, FOR THE FIRST FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH FEE REVENUE WILL BE
COLLECTED OR EXPENDED, OF THE MONEY IN THE ENERGY AND CARBON
MANAGEMENT CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION 34-60-122 (5) ON THE
LIMITATION ON STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING IMPOSED BY SECTION 20 OF
ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION.
(24) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 34-60-115, ANY ACTION
UNDERTAKEN PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (9)(c)(II)(B) OF THIS SECTION OR
SUBSECTION (23)(b) OF THIS SECTION MUST COMMENCE WITHIN FIVE
YEARS AFTER THE DATE THAT THE COMMISSION DISCOVERS THE ALLEGED
-7- 1112

VIOLATION.
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-60-124, amend
(1)(g) as follows:
34-60-124. Energy and carbon management cash fund -
definitions.
(1) The state treasurer shall credit the following money to the
fund:
(g) Money credited to the fund pursuant to sections 34-60-106,
34-64-108 (4), and 37-90.5-106 (4).
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-32-102, add (4)
as follows:
34-32-102. Legislative declaration.
(4) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER DECLARES THAT IT IS IN THE
PUBLIC INTEREST FOR THE BOARD TO SEEK AND RECEIVE PRIMACY OVER
CLASS III INJECTION WELLS BECAUSE PRIMACY WILL ENABLE COLORADO
TO HAVE A TAILORED APPROACH TO INJECTION WELL REGULATION THAT:
(a) PROVIDES A MORE STRAIGHTFORWARD APPROACH TO
PERMITTING, AUTHORIZING, AND REGULATING SEVERAL INDUSTRIES
WHERE STATE AND FEDERAL AUTHORITIES CURRENTLY OVERLAP;
(b) PROVIDES RELIABILITY IN RESOURCE COMMITMENT AND
EXPECTATIONS AMIDST FLUCTUATING FEDERAL PRIORITIES; AND
(c) ESTABLISHES TIMELY AND EFFICIENT AUTHORIZATION AND
PERMITTING PROCESSES.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-32-103, amend
(3.5)(a)(II), (3.5)(a)(III), (5.7), and (8); and add (2.7) and (3.5)(a)(IV) as
follows:
34-32-103. Definitions - rules.
-8- 1112

As used in this article 32, unless the context otherwise requires:
(2.7) (a) "CLASS III INJECTION WELL" MEANS A WELL AS
CLASSIFIED IN 40 CFR 144.6 THAT IS USED TO INJECT FLUIDS AND EXTRACT
MINERALS AND IS DRILLED PURSUANT TO AUTHORIZATION FOR A CLASS III
INJECTION WELL ISSUED UNDER THE FEDERAL "SAFE DRINKING WATER
ACT", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 300f ET SEQ., AND REGULATIONS UNDER THOSE
SECTIONS, AS AMENDED.
(b) "CLASS III INJECTION WELL" DOES NOT INCLUDE A PRODUCTION
WELL THAT BRINGS MINING FLUIDS TO THE SURFACE.
(3.5) (a) "Designated mining operation" means a mining operation
at which:
(II) Acid- or toxic-forming materials will be exposed or disturbed
as a result of mining operations; or
(III) Uranium is developed or extracted, either by in situ leach
mining or by conventional underground or open mining techniques. A
uranium mining operation OTHER THAN IN SITU LEACH MINING may seek
an exemption from designated mining operation status in accordance with
section 34-32-112.5 (2); OR
(IV) A CLASS III INJECTION WELL IS OPERATED, WHICH OPERATION
IS NOT ELIGIBLE FOR AN EXEMPTION FROM DESIGNATED MINING
OPERATION STATUS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 34-32-112.5 (2).
(5.7) "In situ leach mining" means in situ mining for uranium
through the in-place dissolution of mineral components of an ore deposit
by causing a chemical leaching solution, usually aqueous, to penetrate or
to be pumped down wells through the ore body and then removing the
mineral-containing solution for development or extraction of the mineral
values.
-9- 1112

(8) "Mining operation" means the development or extraction of a
mineral from its natural occurrences or within refuse on affected land.
"Mining operation" includes, but is not limited to, open mining, in situ
mining, in situ leach mining, surface operations, OPERATIONS RELATED TO
CLASS III INJECTION WELLS, and the disposal of refuse from underground
mining, in situ mining, and in situ leach mining. "Mining operation" also
includes the following operations on affected lands: Transportation,
concentrating, milling, evaporation, removal of waste piles and refuse,
and other processing. "Mining operation" does not include: The
exploration and extraction of natural petroleum in a liquid or gaseous
state by means of wells or pipe; the development or extraction of coal; the
extraction of geothermal resources; smelting, refining, cleaning,
preparation, transportation, and other off-site operations not conducted on
affected land; or the extraction of construction material where there is no
development or extraction of any mineral.
SECTION 7. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-32-107, add (3)
as follows:
34-32-107. Powers of board - authority to regulate class III
injection wells - misdemeanor - fees - rules.
(3) (a) (I) THE BOARD, AS TO CLASS III INJECTION WELLS, MAY
PERFORM ALL ACTS FOR THE PURPOSES OF PROTECTING UNDERGROUND
SOURCES OF DRINKING WATER IN ACCORDANCE WITH STATE PROGRAMS
AUTHORIZED BY THE FEDERAL "SAFE DRINKING WATER ACT", 42 U.S.C.
SEC. 300f ET SEQ., AND REGULATIONS UNDER THOSE SECTIONS, AS
AMENDED.
(II) THE BOARD MAY SEEK CLASS III INJECTION WELL PRIMACY
UNDER THE FEDERAL "SAFE DRINKING WATER ACT", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 300f
-10- 1112

ET SEQ., AND REGULATIONS UNDER THOSE SECTIONS, AS AMENDED. THE
BOARD MAY ADOPT RULES FOR THE PURPOSES OF ESTABLISHING AND
OPERATING THE UNDERGROUND INJECTION CONTROL AUTHORIZATION AND
PERMIT PROGRAM. THE RULES ADOPTED BY THE BOARD MUST MEET THE
REQUIREMENTS PRESCRIBED BY 42 U.S.C. SEC. 300h (b), AS AMENDED.
THE BOARD SHALL SEEK TO ESTABLISH TIMELY AND EFFICIENT
AUTHORIZATION AND PERMITTING PROCESSES. UPON RECEIVING PRIMACY,
THE BOARD MAY ENFORCE RULES FOR THE PERMITTING, AUTHORIZATION,
AND REGULATION OF CLASS III INJECTION WELLS IN ACCORDANCE WITH
THIS SUBSECTION (3).
(III) THE BOARD MAY ADOPT RULES RELATED TO CLASS III
INJECTION WELLS THAT ARE MORE STRINGENT THAN CORRESPONDING
ENFORCEABLE TECHNICAL FEDERAL REQUIREMENTS ONLY IF IT IS
DEMONSTRATED AT A PUBLIC HEARING, AND THE BOARD FINDS, THAT
RULES MORE STRINGENT THAN THE CORRESPONDING FEDERAL
REQUIREMENTS ARE NECESSARY TO PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY,
AND WELFARE; THE ENVIRONMENT; AND WILDLIFE RESOURCES. A FINDING
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3)(a)(III) BY THE BOARD MUST BE
ACCOMPANIED BY A STATEMENT OF BASIS AND PURPOSE REFERRING TO
AND EVALUATING INFORMATION AND STUDIES RELATED TO PUBLIC
HEALTH, SAFETY, AND WELFARE; THE ENVIRONMENT; AND WILDLIFE
RESOURCES CONTAINED IN THE RECORD THAT FORMS THE BASIS FOR THE
BOARD'S FINDING.
(b) (I) A PERSON THAT WILLFULLY VIOLATES A CLASS III INJECTION
WELL RULE, PERMIT, AUTHORIZATION, OR ORDER OF THE BOARD ISSUED
PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (3) COMMITS A MISDEMEANOR AND, UPON
CONVICTION BY A COURT OF COMPETENT JURISDICTION, IS SUBJECT TO A
-11- 1112

FINE OF AT LEAST FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS AND NO MORE THAN SEVEN
THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR EACH ACT OF VIOLATION AND FOR
EACH DAY THAT THE PERSON REMAINS IN VIOLATION.
(II) ANY ACTION UNDERTAKEN PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(b)(I)
OF THIS SECTION MUST COMMENCE WITHIN FIVE YEARS AFTER THE DATE
THAT THE BOARD DISCOVERS THE ALLEGED VIOLATION.
(c) (I) FOR THE PURPOSES OF IMPLEMENTING AND ADMINISTERING
THIS SUBSECTION (3), THE BOARD MAY ASSESS AND COLLECT FEES,
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PERMITTING AND REGULATORY FEES FOR
CLASS III INJECTION WELLS, IN AN AMOUNT AND FREQUENCY DETERMINED
BY THE BOARD BY RULE. THE BOARD SHALL SET THE FEES IN AN AMOUNT
TO COVER THE BOARD'S DIRECT AND INDIRECT COSTS OF IMPLEMENTING
AND ADMINISTERING THIS SUBSECTION (3).
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE FEES ASSESSED AND
COLLECTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3)(c)(I) OF THIS SECTION TO THE
MINED LAND RECLAMATION FUND CREATED IN SECTION 34-32-127 (1)(a).
(d) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR SHALL PROPOSE, AS PART OF THE
ANNUAL BUDGET REQUEST OF THE DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION
2-3-208, INITIAL SPENDING AUTHORITY IN THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO
ENFORCE RULES FOR THE PERMITTING, AUTHORIZATION, AND REGULATION
OF CLASS III INJECTION WELLS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION (3).
THE OFFICE OF STATE PLANNING AND BUDGETING CREATED IN SECTION
24-37-102, IN CONJUNCTION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL INCLUDE IN
THE ANNUAL BUDGET REQUEST SUBMITTED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2-3-208
A PROPOSAL TO ELIMINATE OR MINIMIZE THE IMPACT, FOR THE FIRST
FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH FEE REVENUE WILL BE COLLECTED OR EXPENDED,
OF THE MONEY IN THE MINED LAND RECLAMATION FUND CREATED IN
-12- 1112

SECTION 34-32-127 (1)(a) ON THE LIMITATION ON STATE FISCAL YEAR
SPENDING IMPOSED BY SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
SECTION 8. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-32-112.5, amend
(2) as follows:
34-32-112.5. Designated mining operation - rules.
(2) If an operator demonstrates to the board at the time of applying
for a permit or at a subsequent hearing that toxic or acidic chemicals are
not stored or used on-site and that acid- or toxic-producing materials will
not be used, stored, or disturbed in quantities sufficient to adversely affect
any A person, any property, or the environment, UNLESS THE PERMIT IS
FOR A CLASS III INJECTION WELL, the board shall exempt such operations
whether conducted pursuant to section 34-32-110 or otherwise. The board
may promulgate ADOPT rules governing the conduct of mining operations
which THAT are exempted pursuant to this subsection (2).
SECTION 9. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-32-122, add (6)
as follows:
34-32-122. Fees, civil penalties, and forfeitures - deposit -
emergency response cash fund - created - definition.
(6) AN OPERATOR THAT VIOLATES A CLASS III INJECTION WELL
RULE, PERMIT, AUTHORIZATION, OR ORDER ISSUED BY THE BOARD
PURSUANT TO SECTION 34-32-107 (3) IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY OF
AT LEAST TWO THOUSAND FIVE HUNDRED DOLLARS PER DAY BUT NO MORE
THAN FIVE THOUSAND DOLLARS PER DAY FOR EACH ACT OF VIOLATION PER
DAY THAT THE VIOLATION CONTINUES.
SECTION 10. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-32-123, add (4)
as follows:
-13- 1112

34-32-123. Operating without a permit - penalty.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION AND
UPON THE BOARD OBTAINING REGULATORY PRIMACY PURSUANT TO
SECTION 32-34-107 (3), AN OPERATOR THAT OPERATES A CLASS III
INJECTION WELL WITHOUT A PERMIT ISSUED BY THE BOARD IS SUBJECT TO
A CIVIL PENALTY AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 34-32-122 (6).
SECTION 11. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-32-124, amend
(7) as follows:
34-32-124. Failure to comply with conditions of order, permit,
or regulation.
(7) Any A person who THAT violates any provision of any permit
issued under this article shall be ARTICLE 32, OTHER THAN A CLASS III
INJECTION WELL PERMIT, IS subject to a civil penalty of not less than one
hundred dollars per day nor more than one thousand dollars per day for
each day during which such violation occurs; except that any AN operator
who THAT operates under a permit issued under section 34-32-110 shall
be IS subject to a civil penalty of not less than fifty dollars nor more than
two hundred dollars per day for each day during which such THE violation
occurs.
SECTION 12. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 34-32-127, amend
(2)(a) introductory portion and (2)(a)(IV) introductory portion; and add
(2)(a)(I)(P) and (2)(a)(IV)(H) as follows:
34-32-127. Mined land reclamation fund - created - fees - fee
adjustments - rules.
(2) (a) The office shall collect fees for STATE fiscal year 2014-15
and for each subsequent year of operation for operations according to the
following schedule:
-14- 1112

(I) Applications pursuant to:
(P) SECTION 34-32-107 (3) RELATING TO CLASS III INJECTION
WELLS.
(IV) Annual fees for STATE fiscal year 2014-15 and for each
subsequent year for operations pursuant to:
(H) SECTION 34-32-107 (3) RELATING TO CLASS III INJECTION
WELLS.
SECTION 13. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 16-5-401, amend
(4.5)(z) and (4.5)(aa); and add (4.5)(bb) as follows:
16-5-401. Limitation for commencing criminal proceedings,
civil infraction proceedings, and juvenile delinquency proceedings -
definitions.
(4.5) The period within which a prosecution must be commenced
begins to run upon discovery of the criminal act or the delinquent act for:
(z) Abuse of a corpse, pursuant to section 18-13-101; and
(aa) Criminal offenses relating to misuse of gametes, pursuant to
section 18-13-131; AND
(bb) OFFENSES RELATED TO A WILLFUL VIOLATION OF RULES,
PERMITS, AUTHORIZATIONS, OR ORDERS RELATED TO UNDERGROUND
INJECTION WELLS ADOPTED BY THE ENERGY AND CARBON MANAGEMENT
COMMISSION PURSUANT TO SECTION 34-60-106 (9) AND (23) OR ADOPTED
BY THE MINED LAND RECLAMATION BOARD PURSUANT TO SECTION
34-32-107 (3).
SECTION 14. Appropriation. (1) For the 2026-27 state fiscal
year, $213,867 is appropriated to the department of natural resources.
This appropriation is from the energy and carbon management cash fund
created in section 34-60-122 (5)(a), C.R.S. To implement this act, the
-15- 1112

department may use this appropriation as follows:
(a) $172,326 for use by the energy and carbon management
commission for program costs, which amount is based on an assumption
that the commission will require an additional 1.3 FTE; and
(b) $41,541 for use by the executive director's office for the
purchase of legal services.
(2) For the 2026-27 state fiscal year, $41,541 is appropriated to
the department of law. This appropriation is from reappropriated funds
received from the department of natural resources under subsection (1)(b)
of this section and is based on an assumption that the department of law
will require an additional 0.2 FTE. To implement this act, the department
of law may use this appropriation to provide legal services for the
department of natural resources.
SECTION 15. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
-16- 1112